Georgia, session 2025_26, HB532.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Code Section 12-6A-12 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to annual grant
when state owns property and calculations, is amended by revising said Code section as
follows:
H. B. 532 (SUB)
- 1 -

LC 47 3467S
"12-6A-12.
(a) Each county in which is located 20,000 acres or more of unimproved real property
belonging to the state and under the custody or control of the department, in which such
state-owned property exceeds 10 percent of the taxable real property in the county, and in
which such property represents 10 percent or more of the assessed tax digest of the county
may receive from the department an annual grant as provided in this Code section.
(b) For each county eligible to receive a grant pursuant to subsection (a) of this Code
section, the department shall calculate the approximate value of public services which the
county provides the department each year; provided, however, that such sum shall not
exceed the amount the county would charge any other landowner for such services. The
department shall request funds in its annual operating budget each year to reimburse all
eligible counties for the provision of such services. In the event the amount appropriated
in any year is less than the amount requested, each eligible county shall receive a pro rata
share based on the estimated value of services provided.
(c) The department is directed to make an annual calculation of the amount of unimproved
state-owned real property under its custody or control and determine which counties are
eligible for a grant pursuant to subsection (a) of this Code section. The first such
determination shall be completed not later than December 31, 2020, and each subsequent
determination shall be made not later than December 31 of each year. The department is
further directed to calculate the approximate value of public services provided by each
eligible county as provided in subsection (a) of this Code section.
(d) Only land acquired with Outdoor Stewardship Trust Fund moneys shall be used in the
calculation of this grant.
(e) No more than 10 percent of Outdoor Stewardship Trust Fund moneys shall be allocated
to grants to offset local taxes during any fiscal year.
(f) No county shall be authorized to receive a grant of funds pursuant to both this Code
section and Code Section 48-14-1."
H. B. 532 (SUB)
- 2 -

LC 47 3467S
SECTION 2.
Code Section 48-14-4 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to annual grant to
counties with 20,000 or more acres of unimproved real estate owned by Department of
Natural Resources, is amended by revising said Code section as follows:
"48-14-4.
(a) As used in this Code section, the term 'department' means the Department of Natural
Resources.
(b) Each county in which is located 20,000 acres or more of unimproved real property
belonging to the state and under the custody or control of the department, in which such
state owned property exceeds 10 percent of the taxable real property in the county, and in
which such property represents 10 percent or more of the assessed tax digest of the county
may receive from the department an annual grant as provided in this Code section.
(c) For each county eligible to receive a grant pursuant to subsection (b) of this Code
section, the department shall calculate the approximate value of public services which the
county provides the department each year; provided, however, that such sum shall not
exceed the amount the county would charge any other landowner for such services. The
department shall request funds in its annual operating budget each year to reimburse all
eligible counties for the provision of such services. In the event the amount appropriated
in any year is less than the amount requested, each eligible county shall receive a pro rata
share based on the estimated value of services provided.
(d) The department is directed to make an annual calculation of the amount of unimproved
state owned real property under its custody or control and determine which counties are
eligible for a grant pursuant to subsection (b) of this Code section. The first such
determination shall be completed not later than December 31, 1993, and each subsequent
determination shall be made not later than December 31 of each year. The department is
further directed to calculate the approximate value of public services provided by each
eligible county as provided in subsection (c) of this Code section.
H. B. 532 (SUB)
- 3 -

LC 47 3467S
(e) No county shall be authorized to receive a grant of funds pursuant to both this Code
section and Code Section 48-14-1."
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 532 (SUB)
- 4 -